Nebraska, session 109, LB828.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB828 LB828
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 9-701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-701 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Financial institution means a bank, savings bank, building and
loan association, or savings and loan association, whether chartered by
the United States, the Department of Banking and Finance, or a foreign
state agency as defined in section 8-101.03; or any other similar
organization which is covered by federal deposit insurance;
(b) Gift enterprise means a contest, game of chance, savings
promotion raffle, or game promotion which is conducted within the state
or throughout the state and other states in connection with the sale of
consumer or trade products or services solely as business promotions and
in which the elements of chance and prize are present. Gift enterprise
does not include any scheme using the game of bingo or keno; any non-
telecommunication-related, player-activated electronic or
electromechanical facsimile of any game of chance; or any slot machine of
any kind. A gift enterprise shall not utilize pickle cards as defined in
section 9-315. Promotional game tickets may be utilized subject to the
following:
(i) The tickets utilized shall be manufactured or imprinted with the
name of the operator on each ticket;
(ii) The tickets utilized shall not be manufactured with a cost per
play printed on them; and
(iii) The tickets utilized shall not be substantially similar to any
type of pickle card approved by the Department of Revenue pursuant to
section 9-332.01;
(c) Operator means any person, firm, corporation, financial
institution, association, governmental entity, or agent or employee
thereof who promotes, operates, or conducts a gift enterprise . Operator
does not include any nonprofit organization or any agent or employee
thereof, except that operator includes any credit union chartered under
-2-

LB828 LB828
2026 2026
state or federal law or any agent or employee thereof who promotes,
operates, or conducts a gift enterprise; and
(d) Savings promotion raffle means a contest conducted by a
financial institution or credit union chartered under state or federal
law or any agent or employee thereof in which a chance of winning a
designated prize is obtained by the deposit of a specified amount of
money in a savings account or other savings program if each entry has an
equal chance of winning.
(2) Any operator may conduct a gift enterprise within this state in
accordance with this section.
(3) An operator shall not:
(a) Design, engage in, promote, or conduct a gift enterprise in
connection with the promotion or sale of consumer products or services in
which the winner may be unfairly predetermined or the game may be
manipulated or rigged;
(b) Arbitrarily remove, disqualify, disallow, or reject any entry;
(c) Fail to award prizes offered;
(d) Print, publish, or circulate literature or advertising material
used in connection with such gift enterprise which is false, deceptive,
or misleading; or
(e) Require an entry fee, a payment or promise of payment of any
valuable consideration, or any other consideration as a condition of
entering a gift enterprise or winning a prize from the gift enterprise,
except that a contest, game of chance, or business promotion may require,
as a condition of participation, evidence of the purchase of a product or
service as long as the purchase price charged for such product or service
is not greater than it would have been without the contest, game of
chance, or business promotion. For purposes of this section,
consideration shall not include (i) filling out an entry blank, (ii)
entering by mail with the purchase of postage at a cost no greater than
the cost of postage for a first-class letter weighing one ounce or less,
-3-

LB828 LB828
2026 2026
(iii) entering by a telephone call to the operator of or for the gift
enterprise at a cost no greater than the cost of postage for a first-
class letter weighing one ounce or less. When the only method of entry is
by telephone, the cost to the entrant of the telephone call shall not
exceed the cost of postage for a first-class letter weighing one ounce or
less for any reason, including (A) whether any communication occurred
during the call which was not related to the gift enterprise or (B) the
fact that the cost of the call to the operator was greater than the cost
to the entrant allowed under this section, or (iv) the deposit of money
in a savings account or other savings program, regardless of the interest
rate earned by such account or program.
(4) An operator shall disclose to participants all terms and
conditions of a gift enterprise.
(5)(a) The Department of Revenue may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out the operation of gift enterprises.
(b) Whenever the department has reason to believe that a gift
enterprise is being operated in violation of this section or the
department's rules and regulations, it may bring an action in the
district court of Lancaster County in the name of and on behalf of the
people of the State of Nebraska against the operator of the gift
enterprise to enjoin the continued operation of such gift enterprise
anywhere in the state.
(6)(a) Any person, firm, corporation, association, or agent or
employee thereof who engages in any unlawful acts or practices pursuant
to this section or violates any of the rules and regulations promulgated
pursuant to this section is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.
(b) Any person, firm, corporation, association, or agent or employee
thereof who violates any provision of this section or any of the rules
and regulations promulgated pursuant to this section shall be liable to
pay a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars imposed by the
district court of Lancaster County for each such violation which shall be
-4-

LB828 LB828
2026 2026
remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with
Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska. Each day of
continued violation shall constitute a separate offense or violation for
purposes of this section.
(7) A financial institution or credit union may limit the number of
chances that a participant in a savings promotion raffle may obtain for
making the required deposits but shall not limit the number of deposits.
(8) In all proceedings initiated in any court or otherwise under
this section, the Attorney General or appropriate county attorney shall
prosecute and defend all such proceedings.
(9) This section shall not apply to any activity authorized and
regulated under the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle
Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, or the State
Lottery Act.
Sec. 2. Original section 9-701, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-5-